Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 427.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means an entity  that is certified and endorsed by the Department of Human
Services to provide services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(b) “Ownership interest” means:
(A) A  direct or indirect ownership interest, or a combination of direct and indirect own-
ership interests, equal to five percent or more in an agency;
(B) An interest in any mortgage, deed of trust, note or  other obligation secured by an
agency if the interest equals at least five percent of the value of the  property or assets of
the agency;
(C) Holding the position of an officer or director of an agency that is organized  as an
entity;
(D) Holding the position of a partner of an agency that is organized as a partnership; or
(E) Holding the position of a member of the  board of directors of an agency that has a
board of directors.
(c) “Provider” means:
(A) An agency;
(B) An adult  foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705, that is licensed to provide residential
care to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities; or
(C) A developmental disability child foster home, as defined in ORS 443.830.
(d) “Responsible person” means:
(A) A person who  exercises operational or managerial control over, who has an owner-
ship interest in or who directly or indirectly conducts the day-to-day operations of an agency;
(B) An owner, operator or resident manager of an adult foster  home, as defined in ORS
443.705, that is  licensed to provide residential care to individuals with intellectual or devel-
opmental disabilities; or
(C) An  owner, operator or resident manager of a developmental disability child foster
home, as defined in ORS 443.830.
Enrolled Senate Bill 136 (SB 136-B) Page 1
(2) The Department of Human Services  may revoke the license, certificate or endorse-
ment of a provider and deny any new application for a license,  certificate or endorsement
submitted by the provider:
(a) For at least 12 months if a responsible person denies the  department access to a fa-
cility or an individual receiving services or directs an employee or substitute caregiver  to
deny the department access to a facility or an individual receiving services.
(b) For at least 12 months if a responsible person alters, conceals,  destroys or otherwise
manipulates records or directs an employee or substitute caregiver to alter, conceal, destroy
or otherwise manipulate records.
(c) For at least 36 months if a responsible person’s persistent, egregious  acts, failures
to act or failures to adequately train or supervise employees or substitute caregivers led  to,
or reasonably would be expected to lead to, the death of or serious harm to an individual.
(3) If the department finds that the operations  of a provider put the health, safety, rights
or welfare of the individuals served by the provider at risk,  the department may revoke,
suspend or impose conditions  on the license, certificate or endorsement of the provider. A
suspension or condition imposed under this subsection may not be lifted until the department
has confirmed that all concerns have been remediated.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  for
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $480,234.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), collected or  received by the Department of Human Services,
for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $480,234.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 136 (SB 136-B) Page 2